Alaska, session 34, SB176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section 06 to read: 07 ROYALTY OIL SALE CONTRACT WITH MARATHON PETROLEUM SUPPLY 08 AND TRADING COMPANY LLC APPROVED AND RATIFIED. In accordance with 09 AS 38.06.055, the legislature approves and ratifies the Agreement for the Sale of Royalty Oil 10 between and among the State of Alaska, Marathon Petroleum Supply and Trading Company 11 LLC, a Delaware Limited Liability Company, and Marathon Petroleum Corporation, a 12 Delaware Corporation, attached as Exhibit 1 to the "Final Best Interest Finding and 13 Determination for the Sale of Alaska North Slope Royalty Oil to Marathon Petroleum Supply 14 and Trading Company LLC" dated April 14, 2025. 01 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.